Massachusetts, session 194th, H5587.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 92 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 34F the
following section: Section 34G. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the
commonwealth the Great Brook State Park Trust Fund which shall be administered by the
commissioner of conservation and recreation. The commissioner shall consult with relevant
stakeholders including, but not limited to, recreational users of the Great Brook State Park,
including cross-country skiers, and the Town of Carlisle. The fund shall be credited with: (i)
appropriations or other money authorized or transferred by the general court and specifically
designated to be credited to the fund: (ii) funds from public and private sources including, but
not limited to, gifts, grants and donations; (iii) fees generated by permits, licenses or other
agreements relating to the use of the Great Brook Farm State Park that are not directed to the
General Fund; and (iv) any interest earned on such money. (b) Amounts credited to the fund
shall be expended, without further appropriation, to advance recreational, educational and
conservation interests including, but not limited to, the construction and maintenance of facilities
of 2

and infrastructure improvements for the area within the Great Brook Farm State Park. (c) The
unexpended balance in the fund at the close of a fiscal year shall remain available for
expenditure in subsequent fiscal years and shall not revert to the General Fund. No expenditure
from the fund shall cause the fund to be in deficit at any point.
of 2